Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-739.03
Natural resources district determination;
effect.

The
determination of certified water uses or certified irrigated acres by a natural
resources district shall not affect the allocations of ground water established
under section 46-740.

Laws 2009, LB477, § 9.